Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Article VI. Enforcement

§ 1815.
Records, reports, access to premises.

The Commission may by rule and regulation prescribe record keeping and reporting requirements for all regulated persons. For purposes of the administration and enforcement of this compact, the Commission is authorized to examine the books and records of any regulated person relating to his or her milk business, and for that purpose, the Commission’s properly designated officers, employees, or agents shall have full access during normal business hours to the premises and records of all regulated persons.

Information furnished to or acquired by the Commission officers, employees, or its agents pursuant to this section shall be confidential and not subject to disclosure except to the extent that the Commission deems disclosure to be necessary in any administrative or judicial proceeding involving the administration or enforcement of this compact, an over-order price, a compact marketing order, or other regulations of the Commission. The Commission may promulgate regulations further defining the confidentiality of information pursuant to this section. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to prohibit (i) the issuance of general statements based upon the reports of a number of handlers, which do not identify the information furnished by any person, or (ii) the publication by direction of the Commission of the name of any person violating any regulation of the commission, together with a statement of the particular provisions violated by such person.

No officer, employee, or agent of the Commission shall intentionally disclose information, by inference or otherwise, which is made confidential pursuant to this section. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall upon conviction be subject to a fine of not more than $1,000.00 or to imprisonment for not more than one year, or to both, and shall be removed from office. The Commission shall refer any allegation of a violation of this section to the appropriate state enforcement authority or U.S. Attorney.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 3, 1993.

§ 1816.
Subpoena, hearings, and judicial review.

The Commission is hereby authorized and empowered by its members and its properly designated officers to administer oaths and issue subpoenas throughout all signatory states to compel the attendance of witnesses and the giving of testimony and the production of other evidence.

Any handler subject to an order may file a written petition with the Commission stating that any such order or any provision of any such order or any obligation imposed in connection therewith is not in accordance with law and praying for a modification thereof or to be exempted therefrom. He or she shall thereupon be given an opportunity for a hearing upon such petition, in accordance with regulations made by the Commission. After such hearing, the Commission shall make a ruling upon the prayer of such petition which shall be final, if in accordance with law.

The district courts of the United States in any district in which such handler is an inhabitant, or has his or her principal place of business, are hereby vested with jurisdiction in equity to review such ruling, provided a bill in equity for that purpose is filed within 30 days from the date of the entry of such ruling. Service of process in such proceedings may be had upon the Commission by delivering to it a copy of the bill of complaint. If the court determines that such ruling is not in accordance with law, it shall remand such proceedings to the Commission with directions either (1) to make such ruling as the court shall determine to be in accordance with law, or (2) to take such further proceedings as, in its opinion, the law requires. The pendency of proceedings instituted pursuant to this subdivision shall not impede, hinder, or delay the Commission from obtaining relief pursuant to section 1818 of this compact. Any proceedings brought pursuant to section 1818 (except where brought by way of counterclaim in proceedings instituted pursuant to this section) shall abate whenever a final decree has been rendered in proceedings between the same parties, and covering the same subject matter, instituted pursuant to this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 3, 1993.

§ 1817.
Enforcement with respect to handlers.

Any violation by a handler of the provisions of regulations establishing an over-order price or a Commission marketing order, or other regulations adopted pursuant to this compact shall:

Constitute a violation of the laws of each of the signatory states. Such violation shall render the violator subject to a civil penalty in an amount as may be prescribed by the laws of each of the participating states, recoverable in any state or federal court of competent jurisdiction. Each day such violation continues shall constitute a separate violation.

Constitute grounds for the revocation of license or permit to engage in the milk business under the applicable laws of the participating states.

With respect to handlers, the Commission shall enforce the provisions of this compact, regulations establishing an over-order price, a Commission marketing order, or other regulations adopted hereunder by:

Commencing an action for legal or equitable relief brought in the name of the Commission in any state or federal court of competent jurisdiction; or

With the agreement of the appropriate state agency of a participating state, by referral to the state agency for enforcement by judicial or administrative remedy.

With respect to handlers, the Commission may bring an action for injunction to enforce the provisions of this compact or the order or regulations adopted thereunder without being compelled to allege or prove that an adequate remedy of law does not exist.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 3, 1993.